Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-289
Derivative action; proper plaintiff.

In a derivative action, the plaintiff must be a partner or an assignee of a partner at the time of bringing the action and (1) must have been a partner at the time of the transaction of which he or she complains, (2) his or her status as a partner must have devolved upon him or her by operation of law or pursuant to the terms of the partnership agreement from a person who was a partner at the time of the transaction, or (3) his or her status as an assignee of a partner must have devolved upon him or her pursuant to the terms of the assignment from a person who was a partner or an assignee of a partner at the time of the transaction.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 57;

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 59.